Maryland, session 2025, HB0408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–8A–27.
(a) (1) A police record concerning a child is confidential and shall be
maintained separate from those of adults. Its contents may not be divulged, by subpoena
or otherwise, except by order of the court upon good cause shown or as otherwise provided
in § 7–303 of the Education Article.
(2) This subsection does not prohibit:
(i) Access to and confidential use of the record by the Department of
Juvenile Services or in the investigation and prosecution of the child by any law
enforcement agency;
(ii) Access to and confidential use of the record by the Baltimore City
Mayor’s Office on Criminal Justice if the Baltimore City Mayor’s Office on Criminal Justice
is providing programs and services to a child who is the subject of the record, for a purpose
relevant to the provisions of the programs and services and the development of a
comprehensive treatment plan;
(iii) A law enforcement agency of the State or of a political subdivision
of the State, the Department of Juvenile Services, or the criminal justice information
system from including in the law enforcement computer information system information
about:
1. An outstanding juvenile court ordered writ of attachment
or an outstanding criminal court ordered writ of attachment, for the sole purpose of
apprehending a child named in the writ;
2. An outstanding criminal court issued warrant, for the sole
purpose of apprehending a child named in the warrant; or
3. A missing child as defined in § 9–401 of the Family Law
Article; [or]
(iv) A law enforcement agency of the State or of a political subdivision
of the State, when necessary and for the sole purposes of facilitating apprehension of a child
and ensuring public safety, from releasing to the public photographs and identifying
information of a child who:
1. Has escaped from:

HOUSE BILL 408 3
A. A detention center for juveniles;
B. A secure residential facility for juveniles; or
C. A correctional unit as defined in § 2–401 of the
Correctional Services Article;
2. Is a missing child as defined in § 9–401 of the Family Law
Article; or
3. The court does not have jurisdiction over pursuant to §
3–8A–03(d)(1), (4), or (5) of this subtitle and who is subject to:
A. Arrest; or
B. An arrest warrant issued by a criminal court; OR
(V) ACCESS TO AND CONFIDENTIAL USE OF THE RECORD BY
THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY COORDINATED YOUTH VIOLENCE REVIEW AND
RESPONSE TEAM.
(3) The Baltimore City Mayor’s Office on Criminal Justice shall be liable
for the unauthorized release of a police record it accesses under this subsection.
Article – Local Government
TITLE 33. PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY COORDINATED YOUTH VIOLENCE REVIEW
AND RESPONSE TEAM.
33–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COUNTY EXECUTIVE” MEANS THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE OF PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(C) “REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM” MEANS THE PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY COORDINATED YOUTH VIOLENCE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS TITLE.
(D) “YOUTH” MEANS ANY PERSON UNDER THE AGE OF 18 YEARS WHO:
(1) RESIDES IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY;

HOUSE BILL 408
(2) ATTENDS OR GRADUATED FROM AN ELEMENTARY OR SECONDARY
SCHOOL IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY; OR
(3) PARTICIPATES IN OR GRADUATED FROM ANY YOUTH PROGRAM IN
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
33–102.
(A) (1) THERE IS A PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY COORDINATED YOUTH
VIOLENCE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(2) THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM SHALL
BE ESTABLISHED BY THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE TO REFLECT A VARIETY OF
ORGANIZATIONS, AGENCIES, AND AREAS OF EXPERTISE AND SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE, OR THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE’S
DESIGNEE;
(II) THE CHIEF OF THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY POLICE
DEPARTMENT, OR THE CHIEF’S DESIGNEE;
(III) THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY HEALTH OFFICER, OR THE
HEALTH OFFICER’S DESIGNEE;
(IV) THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY
PUBLIC SCHOOLS, OR THE SUPERINTENDENT’S DESIGNEE;
(V) THE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF SECURITY
SERVICES FOR PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOLS, OR THE DIRECTOR’S
DESIGNEE;
(VI) THE DIRECTOR OF THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL SERVICES, OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE; AND
(VII) THE SECRETARY OF JUVENILE SERVICES, OR THE
SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE; AND
(VIII) TWO REPRESENTATIVES OF NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS
THAT OPERATE WITHIN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(3) THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE SHALL DESIGNATE A CHAIR OR
COCHAIRS FROM AMONG THE MEMBERS OF THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM.

HOUSE BILL 408 5
(4) THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM MAY ESTABLISH
SUBCOMMITTEES TO CARRY OUT THE WORK OF THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM.
(5) THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE SHALL ESTABLISH REQUIREMENTS AND
PROCEDURES APPLICABLE TO THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM, INCLUDING:
(I) REQUIREMENTS FOR MEETINGS OF THE REVIEW AND
RESPONSE TEAM AND ANY SUBCOMMITTEES ESTABLISHED BY THE REVIEW AND
RESPONSE TEAM;
(II) CONFIDENTIALITY REQUIREMENTS; AND
(III) PROCEDURES RELATED TO THE COLLECTION, UTILIZATION,
SHARING, AND DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION COLLECTED BY THE REVIEW AND
RESPONSE TEAM THAT ARE CONSISTENT WITH OTHERWISE APPLICABLE PRIVACY
LAWS.
(6) (I) EACH ORGANIZATION REPRESENTED ON THE REVIEW AND
RESPONSE TEAM SHALL ENTER INTO A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING THAT
IDENTIFIES PROTOCOLS AND SAFEGUARDS FOR THE CONFIDENTIALITY OF
PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION AND DISAGGREGATED DATA OF YOUTH
AT RISK OF IMMINENT HARM.
(II) THE MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING REQUIRED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL AT MINIMUM INCLUDE PROVISIONS
THAT ADDRESS:
1. DATA SECURITY AND ACCESS;
2. SECURITY INCIDENT AND DISASTER RECOVERY
PROCEDURES; AND
3. SECURE DISPOSITION OF DATA WHEN THE DATA IS NO
LONGER NEEDED FOR CASE MANAGEMENT PURPOSES.
(7) THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM SHALL MAINTAIN
APPROPRIATE ADMINISTRATIVE, PHYSICAL, AND TECHNICAL SAFEGUARDS THAT
PROTECT THE PRIVACY, CONFIDENTIALITY, INTEGRITY, AND AVAILABILITY OF ANY
INFORMATION THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM OBTAINS IN COMPLIANCE WITH
THE FEDERAL FAMILY EDUCATIONAL RIGHTS AND PRIVACY ACT AND OTHER
RELEVANT PRIVACY LAWS AND POLICIES.

HOUSE BILL 408
(B) (1) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION A YOUTH IS AT A HIGH RISK
OF IMMINENT HARM IF THE YOUTH IS AT LEAST 7 YEARS OLD AND UNDER THE AGE
OF 18 YEARS AND IS:
(I) THE VICTIM OF GUN VIOLENCE;
(II) A WITNESS TO GUN VIOLENCE; OR
(III) A FAMILY MEMBER OF A VICTIM OF GUN VIOLENCE.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM IS TO:
(I) REVIEW CASES OF YOUTH IDENTIFIED AS BEING AT HIGH
RISK OF IMMINENT HARM;
(II) IDENTIFY ROOT CAUSES AND PATTERNS WITHIN AND
ACROSS PUBLIC SYSTEMS THAT HINDER UPSTREAM PREVENTION OF VIOLENCE
AGAINST YOUTH;
(III) PROVIDE RECOMMENDATIONS BASED ON IDENTIFIED
FACTORS THAT HINDER UPSTREAM PREVENTION OF VIOLENCE AGAINST YOUTH FOR
QUALITY AND PERFORMANCE IMPROVEMENT;
(IV) FACILITATE COORDINATION AND COLLABORATION AMONG
ENTITIES INVOLVED IN PROVIDING SERVICES TO YOUTH AT HIGH RISK OF IMMINENT
HARM; AND
(V) CREATE SPECIFIC SAFETY PLANS USING WRAPAROUND
SUPPORTS FOR THE YOUTH IDENTIFIED AS BEING AT HIGH RISK OF IMMINENT HARM
AND THE YOUTH’S FAMILY AND COMMUNITY, WHILE PROTECTING INDIVIDUAL
PRIVACY RIGHTS AS REQUIRED BY LAW.
(C) (1) ON REQUEST OF THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM AND AS
NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSE AND DUTIES OF THE REVIEW AND
RESPONSE TEAM, THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM SHALL BE PROVIDED WITH
ACCESS TO:
(I) PUBLIC DATA, RECORDS OF SERVICE UTILIZATION HISTORY,
AND INFORMATION RELEVANT TO AN INCIDENT INVOLVING LAW ENFORCEMENT
THAT INVOLVES A YOUTH AT HIGH RISK OF IMMINENT HARM; AND
(II) PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION AND RECORDS
MAINTAINED BY A STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT AGENCY, INCLUDING STUDENT
RECORDS, DEATH CERTIFICATES, LAW ENFORCEMENT INVESTIGATIVE

HOUSE BILL 408 7
INFORMATION, MEDICAL EXAMINER INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION, PAROLE AND
PROBATION INFORMATION AND RECORDS, AND OTHER INFORMATION AND RECORDS
OF A SOCIAL SERVICES AGENCY, IF THE AGENCY PROVIDED SERVICES TO A YOUTH
AT HIGH RISK OF IMMINENT HARM.
(2) SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT RECORDS REQUESTED OR
PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION ARE SUBJECT TO ANY ADDITIONAL
LIMITATIONS ON DISCLOSURE OR REDISCLOSURE OF A MEDICAL RECORD
DEVELOPED IN CONNECTION WITH THE PROVISION OF SUBSTANCE ABUSE
TREATMENT SERVICES UNDER STATE LAW OR 42 U.S.C. § 290DD–2 AND 42 C.F.R.
PART 2.
(D) (1) IN ORDER FOR THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM TO DISCUSS
INDIVIDUAL YOUTH AT RISK OF IMMINENT HARM AND OTHER HIGHLY
CONFIDENTIAL AND SENSITIVE INFORMATION AND DATA, MEETINGS OF THE REVIEW
AND RESPONSE TEAM SHALL BE CLOSED TO THE PUBLIC AND ARE NOT SUBJECT TO
THE OPEN MEETINGS ACT.
(2) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPHS (II) AND (III) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FEDERAL FAMILY EDUCATIONAL
RIGHTS AND PRIVACY ACT AND THE FEDERAL INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES
EDUCATION ACT, BEFORE REVIEW OF AN INDIVIDUAL CASE, THE REVIEW AND
RESPONSE TEAM SHALL CONTACT THE PARENTS OR GUARDIANS OF THE YOUTH AT
RISK OF IMMINENT HARM AND OBTAIN THEIR CONSENT TO BEGIN REVIEW OF THE
INDIVIDUAL CASE AND RECOMMEND OR PROVIDE SERVICES TO THE YOUTH.
(II) IF THE YOUTH AT RISK OF IMMINENT HARM IS AN
EMANCIPATED MINOR OR AN ADULT, THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM SHALL
CONTACT THE YOUTH’S PARENT OR GUARDIAN BUT THE YOUTH’S CONSENT IS
SUFFICIENT TO BEGIN REVIEW OF THE INDIVIDUAL CASE AND RECOMMEND OR
PROVIDE SERVICES TO THE YOUTH.
(III) 1. IF THE YOUTH AT RISK OF IMMINENT HARM IS A
MINOR AND THE YOUTH’S PARENT OR GUARDIAN DOES NOT PROVIDE THE CONSENT
REQUIRED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH, ANY INFORMATION REGARDING THE YOUTH
MAY BE SHARED WITH THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM ONLY IF THERE ARE
EMERGENCY HEALTH AND SAFETY CIRCUMSTANCES THAT JUSTIFY PROCEEDING
WITHOUT THE CONSENT REQUIRED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH AND ALL OTHER
REQUIREMENTS OF LAW ARE SATISFIED.
2. IF THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM CONSIDERS
INFORMATION ABOUT A YOUTH AT RISK OF IMMINENT HARM WITHOUT THE CONSENT
OF THE YOUTH’S PARENT OR GUARDIAN, THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM SHALL

HOUSE BILL 408
NOTIFY THE YOUTH’S PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF THE INFORMATION THAT IS
CONSIDERED.
(IV) FOR PURPOSES OF OBTAINING THE CONSENT REQUIRED
UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH, THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM SHALL PREPARE A
CONSENT FORM THAT:
1. DESCRIBES THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM AND
ITS PURPOSE;
2. IDENTIFIES THE AGENCIES THAT PARTICIPATE ON
THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM; AND
3. SPECIFIES THE TYPES OF DATA THAT WILL BE
SHARED.
(3) THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM MAY NOT DISCLOSE ANY
INFORMATION THAT IDENTIFIES:
(I) A DECEASED INDIVIDUAL;
(II) A YOUTH AT HIGH RISK OF IMMINENT HARM;
(III) A FAMILY MEMBER, GUARDIAN, OR CARETAKER OF A
DECEASED INDIVIDUAL OR YOUTH AT HIGH RISK OF IMMINENT HARM; OR
(IV) AN INDIVIDUAL CONVICTED OF A CRIME OR ADJUDICATED
AS HAVING COMMITTED A DELINQUENT ACT.
(4) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT THE REVIEW AND
RESPONSE TEAM FROM REQUESTING THE ATTENDANCE AT A TEAM MEETING OF A
PERSON WHO HAS INFORMATION RELEVANT TO THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM’S
EXERCISE OF ITS PURPOSE AND DUTIES.
(E) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ALL
INFORMATION AND RECORDS ACQUIRED BY THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM IN
THE EXERCISE OF ITS PURPOSE AND DUTIES UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) ARE CONFIDENTIAL AND EXEMPT FROM DISCLOSURE
UNDER THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT; AND
(II) MAY BE DISCLOSED ONLY AS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT
THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM’S PURPOSE AND DUTIES.

HOUSE BILL 408 9
(2) (I) MENTAL HEALTH RECORDS ARE SUBJECT TO THE
ADDITIONAL LIMITATIONS UNDER § 4–307 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE
FOR DISCLOSURE OF A MEDICAL RECORD DEVELOPED PRIMARILY IN CONNECTION
WITH THE PROVISION OF MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES.
(II) SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT RECORDS ARE SUBJECT TO
ANY ADDITIONAL LIMITATIONS FOR DISCLOSURE OR REDISCLOSURE OF A MEDICAL
RECORD DEVELOPED IN CONNECTION WITH THE PROVISION OF SUBSTANCE ABUSE
TREATMENT SERVICES UNDER STATE LAW OR 42 U.S.C. § 290DD–2 AND 42 C.F.R.
PART 2.
(3) (I) ONLY THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM MAY HAVE ACCESS
TO PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION.
(II) THE SHARING OF DATA IS LIMITED ONLY TO MEMBERS OF
THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM IDENTIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS
SECTION AND THE DATA MAY NOT BE USED FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT PURPOSES.
(III) STATISTICAL COMPILATIONS OF AGGREGATED,
DE–IDENTIFIED DATA THAT DO NOT CONTAIN ANY INFORMATION THAT WOULD
ALLOW THE IDENTIFICATION OF ANY PERSON TO BE ASCERTAINED ARE PUBLIC
RECORDS.
(4) REPORTS OF THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM THAT DO NOT
CONTAIN ANY INFORMATION THAT WOULD ALLOW THE IDENTIFICATION OF ANY
PERSON TO BE ASCERTAINED ARE PUBLIC INFORMATION.
(5) EXCEPT AS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE REVIEW AND
RESPONSE TEAM’S PURPOSE AND DUTIES, MEMBERS OF THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE
TEAM AND PERSONS ATTENDING THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM MEETING MAY
NOT DISCLOSE:
(I) WHAT TRANSPIRED AT A MEETING THAT IS NOT PUBLIC
UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(II) ANY INFORMATION THE DISCLOSURE OF WHICH IS
PROHIBITED BY THIS SUBSECTION.
(6) (I) MEMBERS OF THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM,
INDIVIDUALS ATTENDING THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM MEETING, AND
INDIVIDUALS WHO PRESENT INFORMATION TO THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM
MAY NOT BE QUESTIONED IN ANY CIVIL OR CRIMINAL PROCEEDING ABOUT
INFORMATION PRESENTED IN OR OPINIONS FORMED AS A RESULT OF A MEETING.

HOUSE BILL 408
(II) THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT PROHIBIT AN INDIVIDUAL
FROM TESTIFYING TO INFORMATION THAT IS OBTAINED INDEPENDENTLY OF THE
REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM OR THAT IS PUBLIC INFORMATION.
(7) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, INFORMATION, DOCUMENTS, OR RECORDS OF THE REVIEW AND
RESPONSE TEAM ARE NOT SUBJECT TO SUBPOENA, DISCOVERY, OR INTRODUCTION
INTO EVIDENCE IN ANY CIVIL OR CRIMINAL PROCEEDING.
(II) INFORMATION, DOCUMENTS, OR RECORDS OTHERWISE
AVAILABLE FROM OTHER SOURCES ARE NOT IMMUNE FROM SUBPOENA, DISCOVERY,
OR INTRODUCTION INTO EVIDENCE THROUGH THOSE SOURCES SOLELY BECAUSE
THEY WERE PRESENTED DURING PROCEEDINGS OF THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE
TEAM OR ARE MAINTAINED BY THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM.
(F) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (D) OR (E) OF THIS
SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE
NOT EXCEEDING $500 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 90 DAYS OR BOTH.
(G) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026 2027, AND EACH JANUARY 1
THEREAFTER, THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE,
DE–IDENTIFIED AGGREGATE–LEVEL INFORMATION ON THE YOUTH THAT WERE
SERVED AND CONNECTED TO SERVICES AND THEIR ASSOCIATED RISK FACTORS.
(2) BEFORE SUBMITTING THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM SHALL
ALLOW EACH MEMBER OF THE REVIEW AND RESPONSE TEAM THE OPPORTUNITY TO
REVIEW THE REPORT TO ENSURE THAT IT ALIGNS WITH SAFEGUARDS ON DATA
PRIVACY AND SECURITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.